Hawaii statutes.
§210-7 Loans to development companies.
(a) The department of business, economic development, and tourism may make
loans to development companies incorporated in the State for the purpose of
supplementing the funds required to be forthcoming to qualify development
companies to receive financial assistance under Title V of SBIA. The loans
shall be subject to terms and conditions established by the department as
similar as possible to applicable terms and conditions prescribed by
regulations adopted by SBA.

(b) Subject to the availability of funds, a
request from the high technology development corporation for a transfer of
funds to supplement appropriations for small business innovation research
grants shall be granted expeditiously. If available funds are inadequate for a
transfer to the development corporation, the director shall advise the
development corporation that a transfer will be made when sufficient funds are
available in the Hawaii capital loan revolving fund. [L 1964, c 42, §5; Supp,
§98R-8; HRS §210-7; am L 1982, c 92, §6; am L 1987, c 336, §7; am L 1990, c
293, §8; am L 1991, c 85, §2]

Previous
Vol04_Ch0201-0257
Next